Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 29, 33.

§ 4.1-200.
Exemptions from licensure.

The licensure requirements of this chapter shall not apply to:

A person in charge of an institution regularly conducted as a hospital or sanatorium for the care of persons in ill health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, who administers or causes to be administered alcoholic beverages to any bona fide patient or inmate of the institution who is in need of the same, either by way of external application or otherwise for emergency medicinal purposes. Such person may charge for the alcoholic beverages so administered, and carry such stock as may be necessary for this purpose. No charge shall be made of any patient for the alcoholic beverages so administered to him where the same have been supplied to the institution by the Board free of charge.

The manufacture, sale and delivery or shipment by persons authorized under existing laws to engage in such business of any medicine containing sufficient medication to prevent it from being used as a beverage.

The manufacture, sale and delivery or shipment by persons authorized under existing laws to engage in such business of any medicinal preparations manufactured in accordance with formulas prescribed by the United States pharmacopoeia; national formulary, patent and proprietary preparations; and other bona fide medicinal and technical preparations; which contain no more alcohol than is necessary to extract the medicinal properties of the drugs contained in such preparations, and no more alcohol than is necessary to hold the medicinal agents in solution and to preserve the same, and which are manufactured and sold to be used exclusively as medicine and not as beverages.

The manufacture, sale and delivery or shipment of toilet, medicinal and antiseptic preparations and solutions not intended for internal human use nor to be sold as beverages.

The manufacture and sale of food products known as flavoring extracts which are manufactured and sold for cooking and culinary purposes only and not sold as beverages.

Any person who manufactures at his residence or at a gourmet brewing shop for domestic consumption at his residence, but not to be sold, dispensed or given away, except as hereinafter provided, wine or beer or both, in an amount not to exceed the limits permitted by federal law.Any person who manufactures wine or beer in accordance with this subdivision may remove from his residence an amount not to exceed fifty liters of such wine or fifteen gallons of such beer on any one occasion for (i) personal or family use, provided such use does not violate the provisions of this subtitle or Board regulations; (ii) giving to any person to whom wine or beer may be lawfully sold an amount not to exceed (a) one liter of wine per person per year or (b) seventy-two ounces of beer per person per year, provided such gift is for noncommercial purposes; or (iii) giving to any person to whom beer may lawfully be sold a sample of such wine or beer, not to exceed (a) one ounce of wine by volume or (b) two ounces of beer by volume for on-premises consumption at events organized for judging or exhibiting such wine or beer, including events held on the premises of a retail licensee. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize the sale of such wine or beer.The provision of this subdivision shall not apply to any person who resides on property on which a winery, farm winery, or brewery is located.

Any person who keeps and possesses lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages in his residence for his personal use or that of his family. However, such alcoholic beverages may be served or given to guests in such residence by such person, his family or servants when (i) such guests are 21 years of age or older or are accompanied by a parent, guardian, or spouse who is 21 years of age or older, (ii) the consumption or possession of such alcoholic beverages by family members or such guests occurs only in such residence where the alcoholic beverages are allowed to be served or given pursuant to this subdivision, and (iii) such service or gift is in no way a shift or device to evade the provisions of this subtitle. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply when a person serves or provides alcoholic beverages to a guest occupying the residence as the lessee of a short-term rental, as that term is defined in §

15.2-983

, regardless of whether the person who permanently resides in the residence is present during the short-term rental.

Any person who manufactures and sells cider to distillery licensees, or any person who manufactures wine from grapes grown by such person and sells it to winery licensees.

The sale of wine and beer in or through canteens or post exchanges on United States reservations when permitted by the proper authority of the United States.

The keeping and consumption of any lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages at a private meeting or private party limited in attendance to members and guests of a particular group, association or organization at a banquet or similar affair, or at a special event, if a banquet license has been granted. However, no banquet license shall be required for private meetings or private parties limited in attendance to the members of a common interest community as defined in §

54.1-2345

and their guests, provided (i) the alcoholic beverages shall not be sold or charged for in any way, (ii) the premises where the alcoholic beverages are consumed is limited to the common area regularly occupied and utilized for such private meetings or private parties, and (iii) such meetings or parties are not open to the public.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 4-50, 4-89, 4-90; 1954, c. 147; 1970, cc. 113, 541; 1972, cc. 75, 76, 741; 1973, c. 413; 1975, c. 408; 1976, c. 37; 1981, c. 410; 1984, c. 200; 1992, c. 349; 1993, c. 866; 1995, cc. 497, 518; 2001, c. 117; 2006, cc. 274, 740; 2010, c. 294; 2011, c. 8; 2017, c. 741.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 117, in subdivision 6, in the second paragraph, inserted “wine or” in five places, inserted “fifty liters of such wine or,” inserted “(a) one liter of wine per person per year or (b),” inserted “of beer” in two places,
inserted “(a) one ounce of wine by volume or (b),” and added the third paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 274 and 740 are nearly identical, and inserted “(i) such guests are 21 years of age or older or are accompanied by a parent, guardian, or spouse who is 21 years of age or older and (ii)” in the last sentence in subdivision 7.

Subdivision 7 is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 294 inserted clause (ii) in subdivision 7 and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 8 added the last sentence in subdivision 10.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 741 added the last sentence in subdivision 7.

§ 4.1-201.
Conduct not prohibited by this subtitle; limitation.

Nothing in this subtitle or any Board regulation adopted pursuant thereto shall prohibit:

Any club licensed under this chapter from keeping for consumption by its members any alcoholic beverages lawfully acquired by such members, provided the alcoholic beverages are not sold, dispensed or given away in violation of this subtitle.

Any person from having grain, fruit or fruit products and any other substance, when grown or lawfully produced by him, distilled by any distillery licensee, and selling the distilled alcoholic beverages to the Board or selling or shipping them to any person outside of the Commonwealth in accordance with Board regulations. However, no alcoholic beverages so distilled shall be withdrawn from the place where distilled except in accordance with Board regulations.

Any person licensed to manufacture and sell, or either, in the Commonwealth or elsewhere, alcoholic beverages other than wine or beer, from soliciting and taking orders from the Board for such alcoholic beverages.

The receipt by a person operating a licensed brewery of deliveries and shipments of beer in closed containers or the sale, delivery or shipment of such beer, in accordance with Board regulations to (i) persons licensed to sell beer at wholesale, (ii) persons licensed to sell beer at retail for the purpose of resale only as provided in subdivision B 4 of §

4.1-216

, (iii) owners of boats registered under the laws of the United States sailing for ports of call of a foreign country or another state, and (iv) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

The granting of any retail license to a brewery, distillery, or winery licensee, or to an applicant for such license, or to a lessee of such person, a wholly owned subsidiary of such person, or its lessee, provided the places of business or establishments for which the retail licenses are desired are located upon the premises occupied or to be occupied by such distillery, winery, or brewery, or upon property of such person contiguous to such premises, or in a development contiguous to such premises owned and operated by such person or a wholly owned subsidiary.

The receipt by a distillery licensee of deliveries and shipments of alcoholic beverages, other than wine and beer, in closed containers from other distilleries, or the sale, delivery or shipment of such alcoholic beverages, in accordance with Board regulations, to the Board and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

The receipt by a farm winery or winery licensee of deliveries and shipments of wine in closed containers from other wineries or farm wineries located inside or outside the Commonwealth, or the receipt by a winery licensee or farm winery licensee of deliveries and shipments of spirits distilled from fruit or fruit juices in closed containers from distilleries located inside or outside the Commonwealth to be used only for the fortification of wine produced by the licensee in accordance with Board regulations, or the sale, delivery or shipment of such wine, in accordance with Board regulations, to persons licensed to sell wine at wholesale for the purpose of resale, and to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

Any farm winery or winery licensee from shipping or delivering its wine in closed containers to another farm winery or winery licensee for the purpose of additional bottling in accordance with Board regulations and the return of the wine so bottled to the manufacturing farm winery or winery licensee.

Any farm winery or winery licensee from selling and shipping or delivering its wine in closed containers to another farm winery or winery licensee, the wine so sold and shipped or delivered to be used by the receiving licensee in the manufacture of wine. Any wine received under this subsection shall be deemed an agricultural product produced in the Commonwealth for the purposes of §

4.1-219

, to the extent it is produced from fresh fruits or agricultural products grown or produced in the Commonwealth. The selling licensee shall provide to the receiving licensee, and both shall maintain complete and accurate records of, the source of the fresh fruits or agricultural products used to produce the wine so transferred.

Any retail on-and-off-premises wine and beer licensee, his agent or employee, from giving a sample of wine or beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for on-premises consumption, or any mixed beverage licensee, his agent or employee, from giving a sample of wine, beer, or spirits to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for on-premises consumption. Samples of wine shall not exceed two ounces, samples of beer shall not exceed four ounces, and samples of spirits shall not exceed one-half ounce, unless served as a mixed beverage, in which case a sample of spirits may contain up to one and one-half ounces of spirits. No more than 12 ounces of beer, five ounces of wine, or three ounces of spirits shall be given to any person per day.

Any manufacturer, including any vendor authorized by any such manufacturer, whether or not licensed in the Commonwealth, from selling service items bearing alcoholic brand references to on-premises retail licensees or prohibit any such retail licensee from displaying the service items on the premises of his licensed establishment. Each such retail licensee purchasing such service items shall retain a copy of the evidence of his payment to the manufacturer or authorized vendor for a period of not less than two years from the date of each sale of the service items. As used in this subdivision, “service items” mean articles of tangible personal property normally used by the employees of on-premises retail licensees to serve alcoholic beverages to customers including, but not limited to, glasses, napkins, buckets, and coasters.

Any employee of an alcoholic beverage wholesaler or manufacturer, whether or not licensed in the Commonwealth, from distributing to retail licensees and their employees novelties and specialties, including wearing apparel, having a wholesale value of $10 or less and that bear alcoholic beverage advertising. Such items may be distributed to retail licensees in quantities equal to the number of employees of the retail establishment present at the time the items are delivered. Thereafter, such employees may wear or display the items on the licensed premises.

Any (i) retail on-premises wine and beer licensee, his agent or employee from offering for sale or selling for one price to any person to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold a flight of wines or beers consisting of samples of not more than five different wines or beers and (ii) mixed beverage licensee, his agent or employee from offering for sale or selling for one price to any person to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold a flight of distilled spirits consisting of samples of not more than five different spirits products.

Any restaurant licensed under this chapter from permitting the consumption of lawfully acquired wine, beer, or cider by bona fide customers on the premises in all areas and locations covered by the license, provided that (i) all such wine, beer, or cider shall have been acquired by the customer from a retailer licensed to sell such alcoholic beverages and (ii) no such wine, beer, or cider shall be brought onto the licensed premises by the customer except in sealed, nonresealable bottles or cans. The licensee may charge a corkage fee to such customer for the wine, beer, or cider so consumed; however, the licensee shall not charge any other fee to such customer.

Any winery, farm winery, wine importer, wine wholesaler, brewery, limited brewery, beer importer, beer wholesaler, or distiller licensee from providing to adult customers of licensed retail establishments information about wine, beer, or spirits being consumed on such premises.

Any private swim club operated by a duly organized nonprofit corporation or association from allowing members to bring lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages onto the premises of such club and consume such alcoholic beverages on the premises of such club.

No deliveries or shipments of alcoholic beverages to persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth shall be made into any state the laws of which prohibit the consignee from receiving or selling the same.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-89; 1954, c. 147; 1970, cc. 113, 541; 1972, cc. 75, 76; 1973, c. 413; 1975, c. 408; 1981, c. 410; 1984, c. 200; 1992, c. 349; 1993, c. 866; 1995, cc. 253, 317; 1997, c. 386; 2000, c. 786; 2003, c. 630; 2004, c. 379; 2006, cc. 106, 826; 2007, c. 820; 2011, c. 559; 2012, c. 376; 2013, c. 604; 2014, cc. 123, 455; 2015, cc. 404, 604; 2016, c. 26; 2018, c. 172; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 786, in subdivision A 7, deleted the clause (i) and (ii) designations; and inserted “the receipt by a winery licensee or farm winery licensee of deliveries and shipments of spirits” near the beginning of the subdivision.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 630 added subdivision A 10.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 379 substituted “title” for “chapter” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A; in subdivision A 7, inserted “farm winery or,” substituted “or farm wineries located inside or outside the Commonwealth” for “owned by such licensee,” and inserted “located inside or outside the Commonwealth”; and in subdivision A 9, inserted “or winery” in three places.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 106 added subdivision A 11.

The 2006 amendment by c. 826, in subsection A, substituted “Nothing in this title or any Board regulation adopted pursuant thereto shall” for “This title shall not” in the introductory paragraph and added subdivisions A 12 through A 15.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 820 substitued “subsection D of §

4.1-119

” for “subsection C of §

4.1-119

” in subdivision A 11.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 559 added subdivision A 16.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 376 deleted “from other breweries owned by such person” following “in closed containers” in subdivision A 4.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 604 inserted “distillery” twice in subdivision A 5.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 123, effective July 1, 2014, and c. 455, effective March 31, 2014, are identical and added subdivision A 17.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 404 in subdivision A 14, inserted the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii).

The 2015 amendment by c. 604 deleted former subdivision A 11 and redesignated former subdivisions A 12 through A 17 as A 11 through A 16.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 26, inserted “beer, or cider” preceding “by bona fide customers” and added the proviso at the end of the first sentence in subdivision A 15.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 172 added subdivision A 17.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and deleted subdivision A 8, which read: “The receipt by a fruit distillery licensee of deliveries and shipments of alcoholic beverages made from fruit or fruit juices in closed containers from other fruit distilleries owned by such licensee, or the sale, delivery or shipment of such alcoholic beverages, in accordance with Board regulations, to persons outside of the Commonwealth for resale outside of the Commonwealth” and renumbered accordingly; in subdivision A 10 in the first sentence, substituted “Any retail on-and-off-premises wine and beer licensee” for “Any retail on-premises beer licensee, his agent or employee, from giving a sample of beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for on-premises consumption, or retail on-premises wine or beer licensee,” and in the penultimate sentence, added “unless served as a mixed beverage, in which case a sample of spirits may contain up to one and one-half ounces of spirits”, and in the last sentence, substituted “12 ounces of beer, five ounces of wine, or three ounces of spirits” for “two product samples” and “day” for “visit”; in subdivision A 13, substituted “wine and beer licensee” for “wine or beer licensee” in clause (i); in subdivision A 15, inserted “brewery, limited brewery, beer importer, beer wholesaler, or distiller” and “beer, or spirits” and made stylistic changes.

§ 4.1-201.1.
Conduct not prohibited by this subtitle; tastings conducted by manufacturers, wine or beer wholesalers, and authorized representatives.

Manufacturers of alcoholic beverages, whether or not licensed in the Commonwealth, and wine or beer wholesalers may conduct tastings of wine, beer, or spirits within hotels, restaurants, casinos, and clubs licensed for on-premises consumption provided:

The tastings are conducted only by (i) employees of such manufacturers or wholesalers or (ii) authorized representatives of such manufacturers or wholesalers, which authorized representatives have obtained a permit in accordance with subdivision A 14 of §

4.1-212

;

Such employees or authorized representatives are present while the tastings are being conducted;

No category of alcoholic beverage products is offered to consumers unless the retail licensee on whose premises the tasting is conducted is licensed to sell that category of alcoholic beverage product;

All alcoholic beverage products used in the tasting are served to the consumer by employees of the retail licensee;

The quantity of wine, beer, or spirits provided to any person during the tasting does not exceed 16 ounces of beer, six ounces of wine, or one and one-half ounces of spirits; however, for any spirits tastings, no single sample shall exceed one-half ounce of spirits, unless served as a mixed beverage, in which case a single sample of spirits may contain up to one and one-half ounces of spirits; and

All alcoholic beverage products used in the tasting are purchased from the retail licensee on whose premises the tasting is conducted; except that no more than $100 may be expended by or on behalf of any such manufacturer or wholesaler at any retail licensed premises during any 24-hour period. For the purposes of this subdivision, the $100 limitation shall be exclusive of taxes and gratuities, which gratuities may not exceed 20 percent of the cost of the alcoholic beverages, including taxes, for the alcoholic beverages purchased for the tasting.

Manufacturers, wholesalers, and their authorized representatives shall keep complete records of each tasting authorized by this section for a period of not less than two years, which records shall include the date and place of each tasting conducted and the dollar amount expended by the manufacturer, wholesaler, or his agent or representative in the purchase of the alcoholic beverages used in the tasting.

Manufacturers and wholesalers shall be held liable for any violation of this section committed by their employees or authorized representative in connection with their employment or representation at any tasting event.

History.

2006, c. 826; 2007, cc. 452, 722; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2022, cc. 589, 590.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 452 and 722 are identical, and added the last sentence in subdivision A 6.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision A 1, substituted “subdivision A 14” for “subdivision A 15” in clause (ii); and in subdivision A 5, substituted “16 ounces of beer, six ounces of wine” for “12 ounces of beer, five ounces of wine” and “one-half ounce of spirits, unless served as a mixed beverage, in which case a single sample of spirits may contain up to one and one-half ounces of spirits” for “one-half ounce per spirits product offered and no more than three spirits products may be offered to any patron.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 589 and 590 are identical, and inserted “casinos” in subsection A.

§ 4.1-202.
To whom privileges conferred by licenses extend; liability for violations of law.

The privilege of any licensee to sell or serve alcoholic beverages shall extend to such licensee and to all agents or employees of such licensee for the purpose of selling or serving alcoholic beverages under such license.
The licensee may be held liable for any violation of this subtitle or any Board regulation committed by such agents or employees in connection with their employment.

History.

1968, c. 7, § 4-98.4; 1981, c. 381, § 4-37.2; 1993, c. 866.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Imputed knowledge of illegal drug sales. —

Substantial evidence clearly supported the revocation of a license to sell alcoholic beverages pursuant to subdivision 1 p of §

4.1-225

where the licensee employed two convicted felons, who sold and distributed drugs on the licensee’s premises at the same time as they were serving as agents or servants of the licensee. This section imputed to the licensee knowledge of the activity of its agents or employees, which satisfied the knowledge requirement of §

4.1-225

. Smitty's Inc. v. Va. Dep't of Alcohol Bev. Control, 2010 Va. Cir. LEXIS 11 (Amherst County Jan. 13, 2010), aff'd, No. 0684-10-3, 2010

Va. App. LEXIS 433

(Va. Ct. App. Nov. 9, 2010).

§ 4.1-203.
Separate license for each place of business; transfer or amendment; posting; expiration; carriers.

Each license granted by the Board shall designate the place where the business of the licensee will be carried on. Except as otherwise provided in §§

4.1-206.1

,

4.1-206.2

, and

4.1-206.3

, a separate license shall be required for each separate place of business.

No license shall be transferable from one person to another, or from one location to another. The Board may permit a licensee to amend the classification of an existing license without complying with the posting and publishing procedures required by §

4.1-230

if the effect of the amendment is to reduce materially the privileges of an existing license. However, if (i) the Board determines that the amendment is a device to evade the provisions of this chapter, (ii) a majority of the corporate stock of a retail licensee is sold to a new entity, or (iii) there is a change of business at the premises of a retail licensee, the Board may, within 30 days of receipt of written notice by the licensee of a change in ownership or a change of business, require the licensee to comply with any or all of the requirements of §

4.1-230

. If the Board fails to exercise its authority within the 30-day period, the licensee shall not be required to reapply for a license. The licensee shall submit such written notice to the Secretary of the Board.

Each license shall be posted in a location conspicuous to the public at the place where the licensee carries on the business for which the license is granted.

The privileges conferred by any license granted by the Board, except for temporary licenses, banquet and mixed beverage special events licenses, shall continue until the last day of the twelfth month next ensuing or the last day of the designated month and year of expiration, except the license may be sooner terminated for any cause for which the Board would be entitled to refuse to grant a license, by operation of law, voluntary surrender or order of the Board.The Board may grant licenses for one year or for multiple years, not to exceed three years, based on the fees set forth in §

4.1-231.1

. Qualification for a multiyear license shall be determined on the basis of criteria established by the Board. Fees for multiyear licenses shall not be refundable except as provided in §

4.1-232

. The Board may provide a discount for two-year or three-year licenses, not to exceed five percent of the applicable license fee, which extends for one fiscal year and shall not be altered or rescinded during such period.The Board may permit a licensee who fails to pay:

The required license tax covering the continuation or reissuance of his license by midnight of the fifteenth day of the twelfth month or of the designated month of expiration, whichever is applicable, to pay the tax in lieu of posting and publishing notice and reapplying, provided payment of the tax is made within 30 days following that date and is accompanied by a civil penalty of $25 or 10 percent of such tax, whichever is greater; and

The tax and civil penalty pursuant to subdivision 1 to pay the tax in lieu of posting and publishing notice and reapplying, provided payment of the tax is made within 45 days following the 30 days specified in subdivision 1 and is accompanied by a civil penalty of $100 or 25 percent of such tax, whichever is greater.Such civil penalties collected by the Board shall be deposited in accordance with §

4.1-114

.

Subsections A and C shall not apply to common carriers of passengers by train, boat, bus, or airplane.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-34; 1972, c. 178; 1974, c. 460; 1980, c. 524; 1984, c. 180; 1993, cc. 424, 866; 1997, c. 37; 2007, cc. 870, 932; 2013, c. 642; 2015, c. 412; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 424 amended former § 4-34, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, the
1993 amendment by c. 424 has been given effect in this section as set out above. In accordance with c. 424, the last sentence of subsection B was added.

Acts
2007, cc. 870 and
932, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall implement the provisions of this act consistent with an opinion of the Attorney General dated April 18, 2006, within 90 days of the effective date of this act.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 870 and 932, effective April 4, 2007, are identical, and inserted “Except as otherwise provided in §§

4.1-207

and

4.1-208

” at the beginning of the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by c. 642, in subsection D, rewrote the second paragraph, which formerly read: “The Board may permit a licensee who fails to pay by midnight of the fifteenth day of the twelfth month or of the designated month of expiration, whichever is applicable, the required license tax covering the continuation or reissuance of his license, to pay the tax in lieu of posting and publishing notice and reapplying, provided payment of the tax is made within thirty days following that date and is accompanied by a civil penalty of twenty-five dollars or ten percent of such tax, whichever is greater,” and added the last paragraph thereof; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 in subsection D, inserted “and year” preceding “of expiration” and added the second paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subsection A, substituted “§§

4.1-206.1

,

4.1-206.2

, and

4.1-206.3

” for “§§

4.1-207

and

4.1-208

”; in subsection D, second paragraph, substituted “§

4.1-231.1

” for “§

4.1-231

” in the first sentence; and in subsection E, inserted “bus.”

§ 4.1-203.1.
Managers of licensed retail establishments.

The Board may suspend or revoke any license if it finds that the licensee has been convicted for a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(f), as amended, for actions of its managers or otherwise constituting a pattern or practice of employing unauthorized aliens on the licensed premises in the Commonwealth.

History.

2012, c. 643.